District of Columbia statutes.
45-601

Rules stated.

In the interpretation and construction of this Code the following rules shall be observed.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1189, ch. 854
The term “Code” as used in this section means “An Act To establish a code of law for the District of Columbia, 31 Stat. 1189 through 31 Stat. 1436.”
1973 Ed., § 49-201.
1981 Ed., § 49-201.